Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.300

Garnishee protected against claim of defendant.

It shall be a sufficient answer to any claim of the defendant against the garnishee founded on any indebtedness of the garnishee or on the possession or control by the garnishee of any personal property or effects, for the garnishee to show that such indebtedness was paid or such personal property or effects were delivered under the judgment of the court in accordance with this chapter.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1030; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 30. Formerly RCW 7.33.300.]